Washington statutes.
RCW 18.89.020

Definitions.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Department" means the department of health.

(2) "Direct supervision" means a health care practitioner is continuously on-site and physically present in the treatment operatory while the procedures are performed by the respiratory care practitioner.

(3) "Health care practitioner" means:

(a) A physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW;

(b) An osteopathic physician or surgeon licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW; or

(c) Acting within the scope of their respective licensure, a podiatric physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW, an *advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, a naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW, or a physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW.

(4) "Respiratory care practitioner" means an individual licensed under this chapter.

(5) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

[2021 c 114 s 2; 2020 c 80 s 20. Prior: 2011 c 235 s 1; 1997 c 334 s 3; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 511; 1991 c 3 s 227; 1987 c 415 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "advanced registered nurse practitioner" was changed to "advanced practice registered nurse" by 2024 c 239 s 1, effective June 30, 2027.

Effective date—2021 c 114: See note following RCW 18.89.010.

Effective date—2020 c 80 ss 12-59: See note following RCW 7.68.030.

Intent—2020 c 80: See note following RCW 18.71A.010.

Effective dates—1997 c 334: See note following RCW 18.89.010.

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.